Hawaii, session 2025, HB876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a shortage of health care providers in the State, particularly primary care providers, which will be exacerbated by the projected retirement of current physicians, advanced practice registered nurses, pharmacists, and other health care workers.  Although students are interested in pursuing careers in Hawaii's health care service industry, in-state educational institutions are constrained by the lack of clinical education sites in the State and the limited supply of qualified preceptors.  One way to encourage the participation of preceptors is to offer an income tax credit for health care professionals who serve as preceptors. The purpose of the existing healthcare preceptor income tax credit is to incentivize volunteer preceptors to offer professional instruction, training, and supervision to students and residents seeking careers as health care providers in the State.  During the implementation of the tax credit, many providers trained eligible students, but only a small subset met the eligibility requirements due to the primary care qualifying criterion for the preceptor. The legislature recognizes that programs training physicians, advanced practice registered nurses, pharmacists, and physician assistants in primary care also require training from specialty preceptors.  The legislature further recognizes that the health care workforce has shortages in professions beyond those included in the tax credit and whose workforce expansion is also limited by available preceptors, including psychologists, physician assistants, marriage and family therapists, mental health counselors, clinical social workers, rehabilitation counselors, and school counselors.  As such, the healthcare preceptor tax credit should not be limited to physicians, advanced practice registered nurses, and pharmacists and should be expanded. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Include psychology, physician assistant, marriage and family therapist, mental health counselor, clinical social worker, rehabilitation counselor, and school counselor students in the definition of "eligible student"; and (2)  Amend the definition of "preceptor", including adding psychologists, physician assistants, marriage and family therapists, mental health counselors, clinical social workers, rehabilitation counselors, and school counselors to the list of preceptors eligible to receive a tax credit. SECTION 2.  Section 235-110.25, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows: "(g)  For the purposes of this section: "Academic program" means an academic degree granting program or graduate medical education program that: (1)  Holds either its principal accreditation or a physical location in Hawaii; and (2)  Provides education to students, of whom more than fifty per cent are residents of Hawaii. "Advanced practice registered nurse student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program that is for the education of advanced practice registered nurses and recognized by the state board of nursing pursuant to chapter 457. "Clinical social worker student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program  for the training of individuals to become licensed clinical social workers pursuant to chapter 467E. "Eligible professional degree or training certificate" means a degree or certificate that fulfills a requirement to be a marriage and family therapist, pursuant to chapter 451J; a physician [or], osteopathic physician, or physician assistant, pursuant to chapter 453[,]; a mental health counselor, pursuant to chapter 453D; an advanced practice registered nurse, pursuant to chapter 457[, or]; a pharmacist, pursuant to chapter 461[.]; a psychologist, pursuant to chapter 465; a clinical social worker, pursuant to chapter 467E; a rehabilitation counselor; or school counselor. "Eligible student" means an advanced practice registered nurse student, marriage and family therapy student, medical student, mental health counselor student, [or] pharmacy student, physician assistant student, psychology student, clinical social worker student, rehabilitation counselor student, or school counselor student, who is enrolled in [an] a nationally accredited academic program. "Marriage and family therapy student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program for the training of individuals to become licensed marriage and family therapists pursuant to chapter 451J. "Medical student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program leading to the medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy degree.  "Medical student" includes graduates from nationally accredited academic programs who have continued their training, in the role of resident or fellow, to obtain the additional qualifications needed for medical licensure, pursuant to chapter 453, or specialty certification. "Mental health counselor student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program for the training of individuals to become licensed mental health counselors pursuant to chapter 453D. "Nationally accredited" means holding an institutional accreditation by name to offer post-secondary medical primary care education. Accreditation for medical students shall be offered by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education or American Osteopathic Association Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation. Accreditation for advanced practice registered nurse students shall be offered by the Commission on Collegiate Nursing Education.  Accreditation for pharmacy students shall be offered by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education.  Accreditation for physician assistant students shall be offered by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant, Inc.  Accreditation for clinical social worker students shall be offered by the Council on Social Work Education.  Accreditation for psychology students shall be offered by the .  Accreditation for marriage and family therapy students shall be offered by the .  Accreditation for mental health counselor students shall be offered by the .  Accreditation for rehabilitation counselor students shall be offered by the .  Accreditation for school counselor students shall be offered by the . "Pharmacy student" means an individual participating in [an] a nationally accredited academic program [that is nationally accredited] for the training of individuals to become registered pharmacists pursuant to chapter 461. "Physician assistant student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program for the education of physician assistants to become a nationally certified and licensed physician assistant pursuant to section 453-5.3. "Preceptor" means a marriage and family therapist, licensed pursuant to chapter 451J; a physician [or], osteopathic physician, or physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 453[,]; a mental health counselor, licensed pursuant to chapter 453D; an advanced practice registered nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter 457[, or] a pharmacist, licensed pursuant to chapter 461[,]; a psychologist, licensed pursuant to chapter 465; or a clinical social worker, licensed pursuant to chapter 467E, who is a resident of Hawaii [and who], maintains a professional primary care practice in [this] the State[.], and whose specialty supports the development and training of an eligible student in primary care. "Primary care" means the principal point of continuing care for patients provided by a [healthcare] health care provider, including health promotion, disease prevention, health maintenance, counseling, patient education, diagnosis and treatment of acute and chronic illnesses, and coordination of other specialist care that the patient may need. "Psychology student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program leading to a doctoral degree in psychology and recognized by the state board of psychology pursuant to chapter 465. "Rehabilitation counselor student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program for the training of individuals to become certified rehabilitation counselors. "School counselor student" means an individual participating in a nationally accredited academic program for the training of individuals to become nationally certified school counselors. "Volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation" means an uncompensated period of supervised clinical training of an eligible student that totals at least eighty hours of supervisory time annually, in which a preceptor provides personalized instruction, training, and supervision to an eligible student to enable the eligible student to obtain an eligible professional degree or training certificate." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act, upon its approval, shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________